apertium-hyw.hyw-punct.twol
Alphabet 
 ա  ե է ը ո օ ի լ
բ գ դ զ թ ժ  խ ծ կ հ ձ ղ ճ մ յ ն շ չ պ ջ ռ ս վ տ ր ց ւ փ ք ֆ
 Ա  Ե Է Ը Ո Օ Ի Լ
Բ Գ Դ Զ Թ Ժ  Խ Ծ Կ Հ Ձ Ղ Ճ Մ Յ Ն Շ Չ Պ Ջ Ռ Ս Վ Տ Ր Ց Ւ Փ Ք Ֆ

՚		!apostrophe

՜:՜		!punctuation from the infixial file that's added to every word
՞:՞
՛:՛
%{՜%}:՜   ! irregular punctuation inside lexical entries
%{՞%}:՞
%{՛%}:՛



!other punctuation symbols
%-
֊ 
– 
 — 
, 
՝
։
.
'
 «
»
%(
%)
՚
՟
…    
ՙ    

% 
;

Sets

InfixPunctAdded = ՜ ՞ ՛ ; 
InfixPunctLexical = %{՜%}  %{՞%} %{՛%} ;
Vowel = 	ա  ե է ը ո օ ի  
		Ա  Ե Է Ը Ո Օ Ի  
		;
NonSchwaVowel = ա  ե է ո օ ի  
		Ա  Ե Է  Ո Օ Ի  
		;
Cons = բ գ դ զ թ ժ  լ խ ծ կ հ ձ ղ ճ մ յ ն շ չ պ ջ ռ ս վ տ ր ց ւ փ ք ֆ  
       Բ Գ Դ Զ Թ Ժ  Լ Խ Ծ Կ Հ Ձ Ղ Ճ Մ Յ Ն Շ Չ Պ Ջ Ռ Ս Վ Տ Ր Ց Ւ Փ Ք Ֆ 
       ; 

Rules

!!! Imperative exclamation point
!Some irregular verbs have a C-final imperative, but the exlamation mark is inside the verb
!This will metathesize the exclamation mark in this context
!It only works for verbs like բերել -- the very լալ has a cheat in the lexd
!"delete the exclamation mark when it follows a consonant"
!՛:0 <=> :Cons _ .#. ;
!"add an exclamation mark after an irregular imperative verb's final vowel"
!0:՛ <=> FullVowel _ :Cons* :Cons  ՛:0 .#. ;

!!! Infixal punctuation
!The lexd file adds an infixal punctuation at end of every word
!This marker must metathesize into the rightmost full vowel (=stressed vowel) in regular cases irregular verbs have a C-final imperative, but the exlamation mark is inside the verb
"delete the exclamation mark when it follows a consonant"
՛:0 <=> (:Cons|:ը) :0* _ :0* .#. ;
"metathesize exclamation mark"
0:՛ <=> :NonSchwaVowel _ :0* (:Cons* | :ը* | :0*)*  (:Cons | :ը*)  :0*  ՛:0 .#. ;
	except
		InfixPunctLexical: :*  _  ;

"delete the question mark when it follows a consonant"
՞:0 <=>  (:Cons|:ը) :0* _ :0* .#. ;
"metathesize question mark"
0:՞ <=> :NonSchwaVowel _  :0* (:Cons* | :ը* | :0*)*  (:Cons | :ը*)  :0*  ՞:0  .#. ;
	except
		InfixPunctLexical: :*  _  ;

"delete the vocative mark when it follows a consonant"
՜:0 <=>  (:Cons|:ը)  :0* _ :0* .#. ;
"metathesize vocative mark"
0:՜ <=> :NonSchwaVowel _  :0* (:Cons* | :ը* | :0*)*  (:Cons | :ը*)  :0*  ՜:0  .#. ;
	except
		InfixPunctLexical: :*  _  ;

"deleted added punctuation if the word already has punctuation"
InfixPunctAdded:0 <=> InfixPunctLexical: :*  _   ;

"if the word has a exclamation punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added exclamation punctuation"
%{՜%}:՛  <=> _ :* ՛:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a exclamation punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added question punctuation"
%{՜%}:՞  <=> _ :* ՞:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a exclamation punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added vocative punctuation"
%{՜%}:՜  <=> _ :* ՜:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a question punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added exclamation punctuation"
%{՞%}:՛  <=> _ :* ՛:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a question punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added question punctuation"
%{՞%}:՞  <=> _ :* ՞:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a question punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added vocative punctuation"
%{՞%}:՜  <=> _ :* ՜:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a vocative punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added exclamation punctuation"
%{՜%}:՛  <=> _ :* ՛:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a vocative punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added question punctuation"
%{՜%}:՞  <=> _ :* ՞:0 .#. ;
"if the word has a vocative punctuation, then it takes the quality of the added vocative punctuation"
%{՜%}:՜  <=> _ :* ՜:0 .#. ;
